Utah statutes.
9-6-702.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Committee" means the State-Owned Art Collections Inventory Committee established under Section 9-6-704.

(2)  "Program" means the State-Owned Art Collections Inventory Study Program established under Section 9-6-703.

(3) (a)  "State" means the state of Utah, its executive, legislative, and judicial branches, its departments, divisions, agencies, boards, commissions, councils, committees, and institutions including state institutions of higher education as defined under Section 53B-3-102.

(b)  "State" does not include:

(i)  the political subdivisions of the state; or

(ii)  school districts.

(4)  "Work of art" means visual art of any medium.

